Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1407DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1407DP (3) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 10A.110 Standards adopted by
reference —— access.
Notwithstanding section 17A.6, subsection 3, the department
and any statutorily established board, commission, committee,
or council under the purview of the department may adopt
standards by reference to another publication without posting
the publication to the department’s internet sites if the
publication containing the standards is readily accessible on
the internet at no cost and the internet site at which the
publication may be found is included in the administrative
rules that adopt the standard.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 10A.111 Complaints.
The department may administratively close a complaint that
does not allege a violation of this chapter, the enabling
statute of a board under the purview of the department, or a
rule of a board under the purview of the department.
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 10A.112 Fees.
If a board under the purview of the department is otherwise
authorized by law to establish fees by rule, the board,
following approval by the department, may, or at the direction
of the department, shall, by rule establish or revise such
fees.
Sec. 4. Section 10A.402, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Investigations relative to the practice of regulated
professions and occupations, except those within the
jurisdiction of the board of medicine, the board of pharmacy,
the dental board, and the board of nursing.
Sec. 5. Section 10A.402, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7. Investigations relating to compliance
with state or federal law, if an entity of the executive
branch of state government, except for an institution under
the control of the state board of regents, has entered
into a written agreement with the department to conduct the
LSB 1407DP (3) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
investigation.
Sec. 6. Section 10A.403, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
10A.403 Investigators —— peace officer status.
Investigators of the department shall have the powers
and authority of peace officers when acting within the
scope of their responsibilities to conduct investigations
as specified in section 10A.402, subsection subsections 5
and 7. An investigator shall not carry a weapon to perform
responsibilities as described in this section.
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 10A.508 Confidentiality.
1. The department shall keep confidential the private
information of a person licensed, previously licensed, or
seeking to be licensed by the department or a licensing board
under the administrative authority of the department, unless
otherwise ordered by a court, the lawful custodian of the
records, or another person duly authorized to release the
information.
2. For purposes of this section:
a. “Licensed” shall be construed broadly and includes
but is not limited to registration with or certification by
the department or a licensing board under the administrative
authority of the department.
b. “Private information” means information that can be used
alone or in combination with other information to identify,
contact, or locate a person in that person’s individual or
private capacity, or the disclosure of which would otherwise
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy,
including but not limited to a person’s social security number,
driver’s license number, financial account number, individual
taxpayer identification number, personal identification
number, date of birth, other unique identifying number, home
address, home telephone number, electronic mail address, and
other contact information, and the names of the person’s minor
children.
LSB 1407DP (3) 91
-2- sc/ns 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 8. Section 103.32, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. When an inspection is requested by a property owner,
the minimum fee shall be thirty dollars plus five dollars
per branch circuit or feeder. The fee for fire and accident
inspections shall be computed at the rate of forty-seven
dollars per hour, and mileage and other expenses shall be
reimbursed as provided by the department.
Sec. 9. Section 321L.5, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. A persons with disabilities parking space designated
after July 1, 1990, shall comply with the dimension
requirements specified in rules adopted by the department
of public safety inspections, appeals, and licensing and in
effect when the spaces are designated. The department shall
adopt accepted national standards for dimensions of persons
with disabilities spaces, consistent with the requirements of
federal law. However, these dimension requirements do not
apply to parallel on-street parking spaces.
Sec. 10. Section 321L.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The department of public safety inspections, appeals,
and licensing shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
governing the manner in which persons with disabilities parking
spaces are provided.